Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 1 GENERAL
35-75-116. Payment of bonds - nonliability of state.

Bonds and notes issued by the authority shall not constitute or become an indebtedness, a debt, or a liability of the state, nor shall the state be liable on such bonds and notes, nor shall such bonds or notes constitute the giving, pledging, or loaning of the full faith and credit of the state, but such bonds and notes shall be payable solely from the funds provided for in this article. The issuance of bonds or notes under the provisions of this article shall not obligate the state or empower the authority, directly, indirectly, or contingently, to levy or collect any form of taxes or assessments, to create any indebtedness payable out of taxes or assessments, or to make any appropriation for their payment, and such appropriation, levy, or collection is prohibited.

Nothing in this section shall prevent or be construed to prevent the authority from pledging its full faith and credit to the payment of bonds or notes authorized pursuant to this article, but nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize the authority to create a debt of the state within the meaning of the constitution or statutes of Colorado; and all bonds issued by the authority pursuant to the provisions of this article are payable and shall state that they are payable solely from the funds pledged for their payment in accordance with the resolution authorizing their issuance or with any trust indenture executed as security for such bonds and are not a debt or liability of the state of Colorado.

The state shall not be liable in any event for the payment of the principal of or interest on any bonds of the authority or for the performance of any pledge, obligation, or agreement of any kind whatsoever which may be undertaken by the authority. No breach of any such pledge, obligation, or agreement shall impose any pecuniary liability upon the state or any charge upon its general credit or against its taxing power.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1742, § 1, effective June 19.

35-75-117. Exemption from taxation - securities law.

The income or other revenues of the authority, all properties at any time owned by the authority, any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued pursuant to this article, the transfer of and the income, including any profit made on sale, from any such bonds, notes, or other obligations, and all trust indentures and other documents issued in connection with such bonds, notes, or other obligations shall be exempt at all times from all taxation and assessments in the state of Colorado. Bonds issued by the authority shall also be exempt from the provisions of article 51 of title 11, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1743, § 1, effective June 19.

35-75-118. Fees.

All expenses of the authority incurred in carrying out the provisions of this article shall be payable solely from funds provided under the authority of this article, and no liability shall be incurred by the authority beyond the moneys which are provided pursuant to this article. For the purposes of meeting the necessary expenses of initial organization and operation until such date as the authority derives moneys from funds provided pursuant to this article, the authority may borrow such moneys as may be required for the necessary expenses of organization and operation. Such borrowed moneys shall be repaid within a reasonable time after the authority receives funds provided pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1743, § 1, effective June 19.

35-75-119. Investment powers of authority.

The authority has the power to invest any funds held in reserve, sinking funds, capital reserve funds, or any funds not required for immediate disbursement in property or in securities in which the state treasurer may legally invest funds subject to his control; and to sell from time to time such securities thus purchased and held; and to deposit any securities in any trust bank within or without the state. In addition, the authority has the power to invest any such funds in unsecured promissory notes of a national bank having the highest investment ratings. Any funds deposited in a banking institution shall be secured in such manner and subject to such terms and conditions as the board may determine, with or without payment of any interest on such deposit, including, without limitation, time deposits evidenced by certificates of deposit. Any commercial bank incorporated under the laws of this state which may act as a depository of any funds of the authority may issue indemnifying bonds or may pledge such securities as may be required by the board.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1743, § 1, effective June 19.

35-75-120. Proceeds as trust funds.

All moneys received pursuant to this article, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds, notes, or other obligations or as revenues or receipts, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this article. Any officer, bank, or trust company with which such moneys are deposited shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes of this article, subject to such regulations as the authority and the resolution authorizing the bonds, notes, or other obligations of any issue or the trust agreement securing such obligations provides.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1743, § 1, effective June 19.

35-75-121. Agreement of the state not to limit or alter rights of obligees.

The state hereby pledges to and agrees with the holders of any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued under this article and with those parties who may enter into contracts with the authority pursuant to the provisions of this article that the state will not limit, alter, restrict, or impair the rights vested in the authority to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders of bonds, notes, or other obligations authorized and issued pursuant to this article and with the parties who may enter into contracts with the authority pursuant to this article. The state further agrees that it will not in any way impair the rights or remedies of the holders of such bonds, notes, or other obligations of such parties until such bonds, notes, and other obligations, together with interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid installment of interest and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of such holders, are fully met and discharged and such contracts are fully performed on the part of the authority. Nothing in this article precludes such limitation or alteration if and when adequate provision is made by law for the protection of the holders of such bonds, notes, or other obligations of the authority or those entering into such contracts with the authority. The authority may include this pledge and undertaking for the state in such bonds, notes, or other obligations and in such contracts.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1743, § 1, effective June 19.

35-75-122. Enforcement of rights of bondholders.

Any holder of bonds issued pursuant to this article or a trustee under a trust agreement or trust indenture entered into pursuant to this article, except to the extent that his rights are restricted by any bond resolution, may protect and enforce, by any suitable form of legal proceedings, any rights under the laws of this state or granted by the bond resolution. Such rights include the right to compel the performance of all duties of the authority required by this article or the bond resolution and to enjoin unlawful activities.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1744, § 1, effective June 19.

35-75-123. Bonds eligible for investment.

All banks, bankers, trust companies, savings and loan associations, investment companies, insurance companies and associations, executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds issued pursuant to this article. Public entities, as defined in section 24-75-601 (1), C.R.S., may invest public funds in such bonds only if said bonds satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1744, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1131, § 73, effective July 1.

35-75-124. Account of activities - receipts for expenditures - report - audit.

The authority shall keep an accurate account of all its activities and of all its receipts and expenditures. The state auditor may investigate the affairs of the authority, may examine the properties and records of the authority, and may prescribe methods of accounting and the rendering of periodical reports in relation to undertakings by the authority.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1744, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 950, § 2, effective March 26.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1221, § 19, effective August 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996.

35-75-125. Federal social security act.

The authority may take such action as it deems appropriate to enable its employees to come within the provisions and obtain the benefits of the federal "Social Security Act", as from time to time amended.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1744, § 1, effective June 19.

Cross references:

For the federal "Social Security Act" generally, see 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.

35-75-126. Powers of authority not restricted.

This article shall not be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers which the authority might otherwise have under any laws of this state but shall be construed as cumulative of any such powers. Nothing in this article shall be construed to deprive the state and its political subdivisions of their respective police powers over properties of the authority or to impair any power over such properties of any official or agency of the state and its governmental subdivisions which may be otherwise provided by law.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1744, § 1, effective June 19.

35-75-127. Repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1745, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 84:

Entire section repealed, p. 950, § 1, effective March 26.